Vermont, session 2025-2026, S49.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PURPOSE
The purpose of this act is to protect the privacy of individuals receiving
reproductive health care services by prohibiting persons, including law
enforcement officials, from using a geofence, or acquiring data gained from a
geofence, to identify or track those individuals or to send messages or
notifications to those individuals. It also prohibits a government entity from
seeking or obtaining a warrant that would target individuals who searched
VT LEG #379102 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.49
2025 Page 2 of 5
electronically for reproductive health services. This act is supported by
Chapter I, Article 22 of the Vermont Constitution, which protects an
individual’s right to personal reproductive autonomy.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. chapter 42B is amended to read:
42B. HEALTH CARE PRIVACY
Subchapter 1. Disclosure of Protected Health Information
§ 1881. DISCLOSURE OF PROTECTED HEALTH INFORMATION
PROHIBITED
* * *
Subchapter 2. Geofencing of Health Care Facilities
§ 1891. PROHIBITION OF GEOFENCING;
(a) Definitions. As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Device” means a cell phone, a computer, a tablet, and any other
device that is capable of transmitting, receiving, or recording messages,
images, sounds, data, or other information by electronic means or that, in
appearance, purports to be a cell phone, computer, tablet, or other such device.
(2) “Geofence” means any technology that uses global positioning
coordinates, cell tower connectivity, cellular data, radio frequency
identification, wireless fidelity technology data, or any other form of location
detection, or any combination of such coordinates, connectivity, data,
identification, or other form of location detection, to establish a virtual
VT LEG #379102 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.49
2025 Page 3 of 5
boundary. It shall also mean the process of identifying whether a device
enters, exits, or is present within a geographic area through the use of any
information stored, transmitted, or received by the device.
(3) “Health care facility” means a hospital, ambulatory surgical center,
health center, clinic, health care provider’s office, or other facility that
provides reproductive health care services and includes the building or
structure in which the facility is located.
(4) “Reproductive health care services” has the same meaning as in
1 V.S.A. § 150.
(b) Prohibitions. No person shall:
(1) use or establish a geofence, or similar virtual boundary, that is within
1,850 feet of any health care facility, other than a person’s own health care
facility, for the purpose of:
(A) identifying or tracking an individual seeking reproductive health
care services; or
(B) sending a notification, message, or advertisement to an
individual’s device that is related to an individual’s reproductive health care
services; or
(2) acquire data of an individual that it knows, or reasonably should
have known, was obtained through the use of a geofence as set forth in
subdivision (1)(A) of this subsection.
VT LEG #379102 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.49
2025 Page 4 of 5
(c) Penalty. A person who violates this section shall be assessed a civil
penalty of not more than $500.00 per violation.
Subchapter 3. Reverse Keyword Warrants
§ 1893. PROHIBITION OF REVERSE KEYWORD WARRANTS
(a) Definitions. As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Reproductive health care services” has the same meaning as in
1 V.S.A. § 150.
(2) “Reverse keyword court order” means any court order, including a
search warrant, compelling the disclosure of records or information identifying
any unnamed individuals, by name or other unique identifier, who
electronically searched for particular words, phrases, character strings, or
websites related to reproductive health care services, or who visited a
particular website through a link generated by such a search, regardless of
whether or not the order is limited to a specific geographic area or time frame.
(b) Prohibition. No government entity shall seek or obtain:
(1) a reverse keyword court order;
(2) the assistance in obtaining a reverse keyword court order from any:
(A) nongovernmental entity;
(B) agency of the federal government; or
(C) agency of the government of any other state or subdivision
thereof.
VT LEG #379102 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.49
2025 Page 5 of 5
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379102 v.1